Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-802
Notice; contents; how served.

The notice shall state the legal description of such burial lot, the property located on such lot which is claimed to be so unsightly, dilapidated, or decayed, and that if the property is not repaired or removed within thirty days after such notice is given, the trustees will proceed to either repair or remove the same. The notice shall be given to, served upon, or sent by certified or registered mail to the owner of record. If the owner of record is deceased or his or her whereabouts are unknown, such notice shall be given to, served upon, or sent by certified or registered mail to any one of the next of kin of the owner of record of such lot. In the event that neither an owner of record nor any one of the next of kin of an owner of record of such lot can be found, the notice may be given by publishing the same one time in a legal newspaper published in and of general circulation in the county in which the cemetery is located or, if none is published in such county, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the cemetery is located. Such notice shall be addressed to the record owner and to all persons having or claiming any interest in or to the burial lot, which shall be set forth in such notice by its legal description. The notice shall date from the date of the delivery or service of such notice, the date of mailing such notice by certified or registered mail, or the date of the publication in the newspaper.

Laws 1945, c. 15, § 2, p. 116;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 7;

Laws 1987, LB 93, § 2.